en: Mashers
xx: Mashers
cs: Mačkadla
da: Mosere
de: Stampfer
es: Trituradores
fr: Presse-purée
it: Schiacciapatate
ja: マッシャー
nl: Stampers
no: Mosere
pl: Tłuczki do ziemniaków
pt: Espremedores de batata para cozinha
ru: Картофелемялки
sv: Pressar
tr: Eziciler

en: Measuring Cups & Spoons
xx: Measuring Cups & Spoons
cs: Odměrné hrníčky a lžičky
da: Målekopper og -skeer
de: Messbecher & Dosierlöffel
es: Tazas y cucharas medidoras
fr: Tasses & cuillères à mesurer
it: Tazzine e cucchiaini misurazione
ja: 計量カップ・計量スプーン
nl: Maatbekers en maatlepels
no: Målebegre og -skjeer
pl: Miarki i łyżki do odmierzania
pt: Xícaras e colheres dosadoras
ru: Мерные чаши и ложки
sv: Mått och måttskedar
tr: Ölçü Kapları ve Kaşıkları

en: Meat Tenderizers
xx: Meat Tenderizers
cs: Paličky na maso
da: Kødmørning
de: Fleischklopfer
es: Ablandadores de carne
fr: Attendrisseurs de viande
it: Inteneritore per carne
ja: 肉たたき
nl: Vleeshamers
no: Kjøttmørnere
pl: Tłuczki do mięsa
pt: Amaciantes de carne
ru: Молотки для отбивания мяса
sv: Köttklubbor
tr: Et Dövecekleri

en: Mixing Bowls
xx: Mixing Bowls
cs: Salátové mísy
da: Røreskåle
de: Rührschüsseln
es: Cuencos para mezclar
fr: Bols mélangeurs
it: Recipienti per miscelazione
ja: ボウル
nl: Mengkommen
no: Blandeboller
pl: Miski kuchenne
pt: Tigelas para preparo de alimentos
ru: Чаши для смешивания
sv: Vispskålar
tr: Karıştırma Kapları

en: Mortars & Pestles
xx: Mortars & Pestles
cs: Hmoždíře a paličky
da: Mortere og stødere
de: Mörser & Stößel
es: Morteros
fr: Mortiers et pilons
it: Mortai e pestelli
ja: すり鉢・すりこぎ
nl: Vijzels
no: Mortere
pl: Moździerze i tłuczki
pt: Pilões para moer
ru: Ступки и пестики
sv: Mortlar och mortelstötar
tr: Havanlar ve Tokmaklar

en: Oil & Vinegar Dispensers
xx: Oil & Vinegar Dispensers
cs: Nádoby na olej a ocet
da: Olie- og eddikebeholdere
de: Essig- & Ölspender
es: Vinagreras
fr: Huiliers et vinaigriers
it: Oliere e acetiere
ja: オイル・ビネガー用ディスペンサー
nl: Olie- en azijnstellen
no: Olje- og eddikdispensere
pl: Dozowniki oleju i octu
pt: Porta-azeite e porta-vinagre
ru: Диспенсеры для масла и уксуса
sv: Olje- och vinägerbehållare
tr: Yağ ve Sirke Dispenserleri

en: Oven Bags
xx: Oven Bags
cs: Pečicí sáčky
da: Stegeposer
de: Bratschläuche
es: Bolsas para horno
fr: Sacs de cuisson pour fours
it: Sacchetti da forno
ja: オーブンバッグ
nl: Braadzakken
no: Stekeposer
pl: Rękawy do pieczenia
pt: Sacos para forno
ru: Мешки для выпекания
sv: Ugnspåsar
tr: Fırın Poşetleri

en: Oven Mitts & Pot Holders
xx: Oven Mitts & Pot Holders
cs: Chňapky na plechy a držáky na hrnce
da: Grydelapper
de: Topfhandschuhe & Topflappen
es: Apartadores y guantes para horno
fr: Maniques et gants de cuisine
it: Guanti da forno e presine
ja: 鍋つかみ
nl: Ovenwanten
no: Grillvotter og kjeleholdere
pl: Rękawice kuchenne
pt: Luvas de forno e pegadores de panelas
ru: Кухонные прихватки
sv: Grytlappar och grytvantar
tr: Fırın Eldivenleri ve Tutacaklar

en: Pasta Molds & Stamps
xx: Pasta Molds & Stamps
cs: Formy a vyřezávače na těstoviny
da: Pastaforme
de: Pastaförmchen
es: Moldes y sellos para pasta
fr: Moules et tampons pour pâtes
it: Stampi per pasta
ja: パスタ型・パスタスタンプ
nl: Pastavormen
no: Pastaformer og -stempler
pl: Foremki i pieczątki do makaronu
pt: Formas para massa
ru: Формы и штампы для макаронных изделий
sv: Pastaformar och pastastansar
tr: Makarna Kalıpları ve Damgalar

en: Pastry Blenders
xx: Pastry Blenders
cs: Hnětače těsta
da: Dejblandere
de: Teigmischer
es: Amasadores
fr: Découpoirs
it: Mixer da pasticcere
ja: パイブレンダー
nl: Deegmixer
no: Deigblandere
pl: Siekacze do ciasta
pt: Liquidificadores para massas
ru: Пекарские струнные ножи
sv: Smördegsblandare
tr: Hamur Karıştırıcıları

en: Pastry Cloths
xx: Pastry Cloths
cs: Papír na pečení cukroví
da: Underlag til udrulning af dej
de: Teigtücher
es: Paños de amasar
fr: Linges de pâtisserie
it: Panni per pasticceria
ja: パン・ケーキ用マット
nl: Bladerdeeg
no: Deigduker
pl: Ściereczki do pieczenia ciasta
pt: Toalhas para pasteleria
ru: Ткань для выпечки
sv: Smördegsdukar
tr: Hamur Bezleri

en: Pizza Cutter Accessories
xx: Pizza Cutter Accessories
cs: Kráječe na pizzu – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til pizzaskærere
de: Pizzaschneider-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para cortapizzas
fr: Accessoires de découpe de pizzas
it: Accessori per tagliapizza
ja: ピザカッター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor pizzasnijders
no: Tilbehør til pizzaskjærere
pl: Akcesoria do noży do pizzy
pt: Acessórios para cortador de pizza
ru: Принадлежности для ножей для пиццы
sv: Tillbehör för pizzaskärare
tr: Pizza Kesici Aksesuarları

en: Pizza Cutters
xx: Pizza Cutters
cs: Nože na pizzu
da: Pizzahjul
de: Pizzaschneider
es: Cortadores de pizza
fr: Coupe-pizza
it: Tagliapizza
ja: ピザカッター
nl: Pizzasnijders
no: Pizzaskjærere
pl: Noże do pizzy
pt: Cortadores de pizza
ru: Ножи для пиццы
sv: Pizzaskärare
tr: Pizza Kesme Aletleri

en: Ricers
xx: Ricers
cs: Pasírovače
da: Grovmosere
de: Kartoffelpressen
es: Pasapurés
fr: Presse-purées
it: Passapatate
ja: ライサー
nl: Grove zeven
no: Mosepresser
pl: Praski
pt: Espremedores de batatas
ru: Прессы для картофеля
sv: Potatispressar med presskål
tr: Patates Rendeleri

en: Rolling Pin Accessories
xx: Rolling Pin Accessories
cs: Válečky – příslušenství
da: Kagerulle – tilbehør
de: Teigrollenzubehör
es: Accesorios para rodillos de cocina
fr: Accessoires pour rouleaux à pâtisserie
it: Accessori per mattarelli
ja: めん棒関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor deegrollers
no: Kjevletilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do wałków
pt: Acessórios para rolos de massa
ru: Принадлежности для скалок
sv: Tillbehör till kavlar
tr: Merdane Aksesuarları

en: Rolling Pin Covers & Sleeves
xx: Rolling Pin Covers & Sleeves
cs: Obaly a návleky na válečky
da: Kagerulle – covers
de: Teigrollenhüllen & -überzüge
es: Fundas para rodillos de cocina
fr: Couvres-rouleau et manchons pour rouleaux à pâtisserie
it: Panni e coperture mattarelli
ja: めん棒カバー
nl: Deegrollerhoezen
no: Deksler og hylser til kjevler
pl: Osłonki na wałek
pt: Capas e protetores para rolos de macarrão
ru: Чехлы и рукава для скалок
sv: Överdrag och höljen till kavlar
tr: Merdane Örtü ve Kılıfları

en: Rolling Pin Rings
xx: Rolling Pin Rings
cs: Kroužky na válečky
da: Kagerulle – ringe
de: Abstandsringe für Teigrollen
es: Anillos niveladores para rodillos de cocina
fr: Bagues pour rouleaux à pâtisserie
it: Anelli per mattarelli
ja: めん棒リング
nl: Deegrollerringen
no: Kjevleringer
pl: Pierścienie do wałków
pt: Anéis para rolos de macarrão
ru: Кольца для скалок
sv: Kavelringar
tr: Merdane Halkaları

en: Rolling Pins
xx: Rolling Pins
cs: Válečky
da: Kageruller
de: Teigrollen
es: Rodillos de cocina
fr: Rouleaux à pâtisserie
it: Mattarelli
ja: めん棒
nl: Deegrollers
no: Kjevler
pl: Wałki do ciasta
pt: Rolos de massa
ru: Скалки
sv: Kavlar
tr: Merdaneler

en: Salad Dressing Mixers & Shakers
xx: Salad Dressing Mixers & Shakers
cs: Mixéry a šejkry na salátové dresingy
da: Salatdressing – blandere og shakere
de: Dressing-Shaker
es: Mezcladores de aliños
fr: Mélangeurs et shakers à vinaigrette
it: Miscelatori per condimento insalata
ja: ドレッシングシェーカー
nl: Shakebekers voor saladedressing
no: Blandere til salatdressinger
pl: Miksery i shakery do dressingów do sałatek
pt: Misturadores para molho de salada
ru: Миксеры и шейкеры для заправок для салатов
sv: Vispar och shakers för salladsdressing
tr: Salata Sosu Karıştırıcı ve Çalkalayıcıları

en: Salad Spinners
xx: Salad Spinners
cs: Salátovače
da: Salatslynger
de: Salatschleudern
es: Escurridores de ensalada
fr: Essoreuses à salade
it: Centrifughe per insalata
ja: サラダスピナー
nl: Slacentrifuges
no: Salatsentrifuger
pl: Osuszacze do sałaty
pt: Centrífugas de salada
ru: Центрифуги для обсушки салатных листьев
sv: Salladsslungor
tr: Salata Kurutucuları